Tennessee, session 114, SB2361.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-108, is amended by deleting
subdivision (6) and substituting:
(6) Once every three (3) years, provide a report to the governor and general
assembly on the status of pre-kindergarten programs that includes, at a minimum, the
number, location, and types of providers of pre-kindergarten classrooms and the number
of at-risk children served. The report must be published on the department of education,
office of early learning's website.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2361
012160
- 1 -